Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.250

Qualifications of members, stockholders.

(1) Under the terms and conditions prescribed in the bylaws, an association may admit as members, or issue common stock to, only such persons as are engaged in the production of fishery products to be handled by or through the association, including the lessees and tenants of boats and equipment used for the production of such fishery products and any lessors and landlords who receive as rent all or part of the fish produced by such leased equipment.

(2) If a member of a nonstock association is other than a natural person, such member may be represented by any individual duly authorized in writing.

(3) One association may become a member or stockholder of any other association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 25.]